Utah statutes.
10-5-110.   Budgets effective for year -- Amendment -- Public access.

On final adoption, each budget shall be in effect for the budget year, subject to later amendment. A copy of each adopted budget shall be available to the public during regular business hours.



Enacted by Chapter 34, 1983 General Session

